Virginia statutes. Title 33.2. Highways and Other Surface Transportation Systems.
Article 1. General Policies and Regulations.

§ 33.2-1200.
Policy; definitions.

In order to promote the safety, convenience, and enjoyment of travel on and protection of the public investment in highways within the Commonwealth, attract tourists and promote the prosperity, economic well-being, and general welfare of the Commonwealth, and preserve and enhance the natural scenic beauty or aesthetic features of the highways and adjacent areas, the General Assembly declares it to be the policy of the Commonwealth that the erection and maintenance of outdoor advertising in areas adjacent to the rights-of-way of the highways within the Commonwealth shall be regulated in accordance with the terms of this article and regulations promulgated by the Board pursuant thereto.

As used in this article, unless the context requires a different meaning:“Advertisement” means any writing, printing, picture, painting, display, emblem, drawing, sign, or similar device that is posted or displayed outdoors on real property and is intended to invite or to draw the attention of or solicit the patronage or support of the public to any goods, merchandise, real or personal property, business, services, entertainment, or amusement manufactured, produced, bought, sold, conducted, furnished, or dealt in by any person. “Advertisement” includes any part of an advertisement recognizable as such.“Advertising structure” means any rigid or semirigid material, with or without any advertisement displayed thereon, situated upon or attached to real property outdoors, primarily or principally for the purpose of furnishing a background or base or support upon which an advertisement may be posted or displayed.“Area of an advertising structure” means the area determined from its outside measurements, excluding as a part thereof the height and overall width of supports and supporting structure and any other portion or portions thereof beneath the normal area upon which an advertisement is posted or intended to be posted.“Billboard sign” means any sign, advertisement, or advertising structure as defined in this section owned by a person, firm, or corporation in the business of outdoor advertising.“Business of outdoor advertising” means the erection, use, or maintenance of advertising structures or the posting or display of outdoor advertisements by any person who receives profit gained from rentals or any other compensation from any other person for the use or maintenance of such advertising structures or the posting or display of such advertisements, except reasonable compensation for materials and labor used or furnished in the actual erection of advertising structures or the actual posting of advertisements. “Business of outdoor advertising” does not include the leasing or rental of advertising structures or advertisements used to advertise products, services, or entertainment sold or provided on the premises where the advertising structures or advertisement is located.“Centerline of the highway” means a line equidistant from the edges of the median separating the main traveled ways of a divided highway or the centerline of the main traveled way of a nondivided highway.“Distance from edge of a right-of-way” means the horizontal distance measured along a line normal or perpendicular to the centerline of the highway.“Federal-aid primary highway” means any highway within that portion of the primary state highway system as established and maintained under Article 2 (§

33.2-310

et seq.) of Chapter 3, including extensions of such system within municipalities, that has been approved by the Secretary of Transportation pursuant to 23 U.S.C. § 103(b), as that system existed on June 1, 1991.“Highway” means every way or place of whatever nature open to the use of the public for purposes of vehicular travel in the Commonwealth.“Historic place, museum, or shrine” includes only places that are maintained wholly at public expense or by a nonprofit organization.“Information center” means an area or site established and maintained at rest areas for the purpose of informing the public of places of interest within the Commonwealth and providing such other information as the Commonwealth may consider desirable.“Interchange” means a grade separated intersection with one or more turning roadways for travel between intersection legs, or an intersection at grade, where two or more highways join or cross.“Lawfully erected” means any sign that was erected pursuant to the issuance of a permit from the Commissioner of Highways under §

33.2-1208

, unless the local governing body has evidence of noncompliance with ordinances in effect at the time the sign was erected.“Legible” means capable of being read without visual aid by a person of normal visual acuity.“Maintain” means to allow to exist.“Main traveled way” means the traveled way of a highway on which through traffic is carried. In the case of a divided highway, the traveled way of each of the separated roadways for traffic in opposite directions is a main traveled way. “Main traveled way” does not include such facilities as frontage roads, turning roadways, or parking areas.“National Highway System” means the federal-aid highway system referenced in 23 U.S.C. § 103(b), and regulations adopted pursuant thereto. For the purpose of this article, outdoor advertising controls on the National Highway System shall be implemented as those highways are designated and approved by congressional action or designation by the U.S. Secretary of Transportation and such designation and approval shall be kept on file in the central office of the Department of Transportation and placed in the minutes of the Commonwealth Transportation Board by the Commissioner of Highways. Prior to congressional approval or designation by the U.S. Secretary of Transportation, highways classified as National System of Interstate and Defense Highways, Dwight D. Eisenhower National System of Interstate and Defense Highways, Interstate System, or federal-aid primary highway as defined in this section shall be considered as the National Highway System.“Nonconforming sign,” “nonconforming advertisement,” or “nonconforming advertising structure” means one that was lawfully erected adjacent to any highway in the Commonwealth but that does not comply with the provisions of state law, state regulations, or ordinances adopted by local governing bodies passed at a later date or that later fails to comply with state law, state regulations, or ordinances adopted by local governing bodies due to changed conditions.“Person” includes an individual, partnership, association, or corporation.“Post” means post, display, print, paint, burn, nail, paste, or otherwise attach.“Real property” includes any property physically attached or annexed to real property in any manner whatsoever.“Rest area” means an area or site established and maintained within or adjacent to the right-of-way or under public supervision or control for the convenience of the traveling public.“Scenic area” means any public park or area of particular scenic beauty or historical significance designated as a scenic area by the Board.“Sign” means any outdoor sign, display, device, figure, painting, drawing, message, placard, poster, billboard, or other thing that is designed, intended, or used to advertise or inform, any part of the advertising or informative contents of which is visible from any highway.“Trade name” includes a brand name, trademark, distinctive symbol, or other similar device or thing used to identify particular products or services.“Traveled way” means the portion of a roadway for the movement of vehicles, exclusive of shoulders.“Turning roadway” means a connecting roadway for traffic turning between two intersection legs of an interchange.“Urban area” means an urbanized area or, in the case of an urbanized area encompassing more than one state, that part of the urbanized area within the Commonwealth, or an urban place.“Urbanized area” means an area so designated by the U.S. Census Bureau, within boundaries fixed by the Commissioner of Highways, in his discretion, in cooperation with the governing bodies of the localities affected and the appropriate federal authority. Such boundaries shall, at a minimum, encompass the entire urbanized area within a state as designated by the U.S. Census Bureau.“Urban place” means an area so designated by the U.S. Census Bureau having a population of 5,000 or more and not within any urbanized area, within boundaries fixed by the Commissioner of Highways, in his discretion, in cooperation with the governing bodies of the localities affected and the appropriate federal authority. Such boundaries shall, at a minimum, encompass the entire urban place designated by the U.S. Census Bureau.“Virginia byway” and “scenic highway” means those highways designated by the Board pursuant to §

33.2-405

. For the purposes of this article, a Virginia byway means a scenic byway as referenced in 23 U.S.C. § 131(s).“Visible” means capable of being seen (whether or not legible) without visual aid by a person of normal visual acuity.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 33-298, 33-310; 1954, c. 588; 1960, c. 406; 1962, c. 176; 1966, c. 663; 1970, c. 322, §§ 33.1-351, 33.1-363; 1976, c. 14; 1980, c. 275; 1984, c. 750; 1993, c. 538; 1996, c. 777; 2000, cc. 432, 449; 2002, c. 672; 2012, c. 145; 2013, c. 127; 2014, c. 805.

Cross references.

As to regulation of outdoor alcoholic beverage signs, see §

4.1-113.1

.

§ 33.2-1201.
Enforcement of provisions by Commissioner of Highways.

The Commissioner of Highways shall administer and enforce the provisions of this article. He may assign to division engineers and other employees in the Department such duties other than discretionary powers as he may deem appropriate.

History.

Code 1950, § 33-299; 1970, c. 322, § 33.1-352; 2014, c. 805.

§ 33.2-1202.
Territory to which article applies.

The territory under the jurisdiction of the Commissioner of Highways for the purposes of this article shall include all of the Commonwealth, exclusive of that portion thereof that lies within the corporate limits of municipalities, except the jurisdiction of the Commissioner of Highways shall apply to all the territory within municipalities on which signs, advertisements, or advertising structures are visible from the main traveled way of any Interstate System highway, federal-aid primary highway as that system existed on June 1, 1991, or National Highway System highway.

History.

Code 1950, § 33-300; 1970, c. 322, § 33.1-353; 1993, c. 538; 2014, c. 805.

§ 33.2-1203.
Entry upon lands; hindering Commissioner of Highways or agent.

The Commissioner of Highways and all employees under his direction may enter upon such lands as may be necessary in the performance of their functions and duties as prescribed by this article. Any person who hinders or obstructs the Commissioner of Highways or any assistant or agent of the Commissioner of Highways in carrying out such functions and duties is guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor.

History.

Code 1950, § 33-301; 1970, c. 322, § 33.1-354; 2014, c. 805.

§ 33.2-1204.
Excepted signs, advertisements, and advertising structures.

The following signs and advertisements, if securely attached to real property or advertising structures, and the advertising structures or parts thereof upon which they are posted or displayed are excepted from all the provisions of this article except those enumerated in §§

33.2-1202

,

33.2-1205

, and

33.2-1208

, subdivisions 2 through 12 of §

33.2-1216

, and §§

33.2-1217

,

33.2-1224

, and

33.2-1227

:

Advertisements securely attached to a place of business or residence and no more than 10 advertising structures, with a combined total area of such advertisements and advertising structures, exclusive of the area occupied by the name of the business, owner, or lessee, of no more than 500 square feet, erected or maintained, or caused to be erected or maintained, by the owner or lessee of such place of business or residence, within 250 feet of such place of business or residence or located on the real property of such place of business or residence and relating solely to merchandise, services, or entertainment sold, produced, manufactured, or furnished at such place of business or residence;

Signs erected or maintained, or caused to be erected or maintained, on any farm by the owner or lessee of such farm and relating solely to farm produce, merchandise, services, or entertainment sold, produced, manufactured, or furnished on such farm;

Signs upon real property posted or displayed by the owner, or by the authority of the owner, stating that the property upon which the sign is located, or a part of such property, is for sale or rent or stating any data pertaining to such property and its appurtenances and the name and address of the owner and the agent of such owner;

Official notices or advertisements posted or displayed by or under the direction of any public or court officer in the performance of his official or directed duties or by trustees under deeds of trust, deeds of assignment, or other similar instruments;

Notwithstanding the provisions of §

33.2-1224

, danger or precautionary signs relating to the premises or signs warning of the condition of or dangers of travel on a highway erected or authorized by the Commissioner of Highways; forest fire warning signs erected under authority of the State Forester; and signs, notices, or symbols erected by the United States government under the direction of the U.S. Forest Service;

Notwithstanding the provisions of §

33.2-1224

, notices of any telephone company, telegraph company, railroad, bridges, ferries, or other transportation company necessary in the discretion of the Commissioner of Highways for the safety of the public or for the direction of the public to such utility or to any place to be reached by it;

Signs, notices, or symbols for the information of aviators as to location, direction, and landings and conditions affecting safety in aviation erected or authorized by the Commissioner of Highways;

Signs of 16 square feet or less and bearing an announcement of any locality, or historic place, museum, or shrine situated in the Commonwealth advertising itself or local industries, meetings, buildings, or attractions, provided such signs are maintained wholly at public expense or at the expense of such historic place, museum, or shrine;

Signs or notices of two square feet or less placed at a junction of two or more highways in the primary state highway system denoting only the distance or direction of a church, residence, or place of business, provided such signs or notices do not exceed a reasonable number in the discretion of the Commissioner of Highways;

Signs or notices erected or maintained upon property giving the name of the owner, lessee, or occupant of the premises;

Advertisements and advertising structures within the corporate limits of cities and towns, except as specified in §

33.2-1202

;

Notwithstanding the provisions of §

33.2-1224

, historical markers erected by duly constituted and authorized public authorities;

Notwithstanding the provisions of §

33.2-1224

, highway markers and signs erected or caused to be erected by the Commissioner of Highways or the Board or other authorities in accordance with law;

Signs erected upon property warning the public against hunting, fishing, or trespassing thereon;

Notwithstanding the provisions of §

33.2-1224

, signs erected by Red Cross authorities relating to Red Cross Emergency Stations, with authority hereby expressly given for the erection and maintenance of such signs upon the right-of-way of all highways in the Commonwealth at such locations as may be approved by the Commissioner of Highways;

Signs advertising agricultural products and horticultural products, or either, when such products are produced by the person who erects and maintains the signs, provided that restriction of the location and number of such signs shall be in the sole discretion of the Commissioner of Highways;

Signs advertising only the name, time, and place of bona fide agricultural, county, district, or state fairs, together with announcements of related special events that do not consume more than 50 percent of the display area of such signs, provided the person who posts the signs or causes them to be posted shall post a cash bond as may be prescribed by the Commissioner of Highways adequate to reimburse the Commonwealth for the actual cost of removing such signs that are not removed within 30 days after the last day of the fair so advertised;

Signs of no more than eight square feet, or one sign structure containing more than one sign of no more than eight square feet, that denote only the name of a civic service club or church, location and directions for reaching same, and time of meeting of such organization, provided such signs or notices do not exceed a reasonable number as determined by the Commissioner of Highways;

Notwithstanding the provisions of §

33.2-1224

, signs containing advertisements or notices that have been authorized by a county and that are securely affixed to a public transit passenger shelter that is owned by that county, provided that no advertisement shall be placed within the right-of-way of the Interstate System, National Highway System, or federal-aid primary system of highways in violation of federal law. The prohibition in subdivision 7 of §

33.2-1216

against placing signs within 15 feet of the nearest edge of the pavement of any highway shall not apply to such signs. The Commissioner of Highways may require the removal of any particular sign located on such a shelter as provided in this subdivision if, in his judgment, such sign constitutes a safety hazard; and

Notwithstanding the provisions of §

33.2-1205

, signs containing advertisements or notices that have been authorized by a county and that are located on public park property or school property that is owned by that county, provided that no advertisement or notice is visible from the main traveled way of the National Highway System in violation of federal law.

History.

Code 1950, § 33-302; 1954, c. 588; 1960, c. 406; 1970, c. 322, § 33.1-355; 1971, Ex. Sess., c. 8; 1972, c. 158; 1990, c. 196; 1993, c. 538; 1996, c. 125; 2003, c. 321; 2014, c. 805; 2015, c. 607; 2018, c. 794.

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendment by c. 607 added subdivision 20 and made related changes.

The 2018 amendments.

The 2018 amendment by c. 794, in the introductory paragraph, inserted “33.2-1224”; and inserted “Notwithstanding the provisions of §

33.2-1224

” at the beginning of subdivisions 5, 6, 12, 13, and 15.

§ 33.2-1205.
License required of outdoor advertisers.

No person shall engage or continue in the business of outdoor advertising in the Commonwealth outside the corporate limits of municipalities or within the corporate limits of municipalities if their off-premises sign, advertisement, or advertising structure is visible from the main traveled way of any Interstate System, federal-aid primary, or National Highway System highway without first obtaining a license therefor from the Commissioner of Highways. The fee for such license hereby imposed for revenue for the use of the Commonwealth shall be $500 per year, payable annually in advance. Applications for licenses or renewal of licenses shall be made on forms furnished by the Commissioner of Highways, shall contain such information as the Commissioner of Highways may require, and shall be accompanied by the annual fee. Licenses granted under this section shall expire on December 31 of each year and shall not be prorated. Applications for renewal of licenses shall be made not less than 30 days prior to the date of expiration. Nothing in this section shall be construed to require any person that advertises upon a structure or fixture on its property or a licensed advertiser’s structure or other space to obtain a license.

History.

Code 1950, § 33-303; 1954, c. 588; 1964, c. 619; 1968, c. 519; 1970, c. 322, § 33.1-356; 1979, c. 216; 1993, c. 538; 2014, c. 805.

§ 33.2-1206.
Revocation of license and judicial review.

The Commissioner of Highways may after 30 days’ notice in writing to the licensee revoke any license granted by him upon repayment of a proportionate part of the license fee in any case in which he finds that any of the information required to be given in the application for the license is knowingly false or misleading or that the licensee has violated any of the provisions of this article, unless such licensee, before the expiration of such 30 days, corrects such false or misleading information and complies with the provisions of this article.

Any person whose license is so revoked is entitled to judicial review of such revocation in accordance with the provisions of the Administrative Process Act (§

2.2-4000

et seq.). Any person aggrieved by such judgment shall have the right of appeal to the Court of Appeals.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 33-304, 33-305; 1970, c. 322, §§ 33.1-357, 33.1-358; 1984, c. 703; 1986, c. 615; 2014, c. 805.

§ 33.2-1207.
Bond required from out-of-state licensee.

No license to engage or continue in the business of outdoor advertising shall be granted to any person having its principal place of business outside the Commonwealth or that is incorporated outside the Commonwealth for the posting or display of any advertisement or the erection, use, or maintenance of any advertising structure until such person has furnished and filed with the Commissioner of Highways a bond payable to the Commonwealth, with surety approved by the Commissioner of Highways and in a form approved by the Attorney General, in the sum of $1,000, conditioned that such licensee fulfills all requirements of law and the regulations and orders of the Commissioner of Highways relating to the display of advertisements or the erection of advertising structures. Such bond remains in full force and effect so long as any obligations of such licensee to the Commonwealth remain unsatisfied.

History.

Code 1950, § 33-306; 1970, c. 322, § 33.1-359; 2014, c. 805.

§ 33.2-1208.
Permits required.

Except as otherwise provided in this article, no person, whether engaged in the business of outdoor advertising or not, shall erect, use, maintain, post, or display any advertisement or advertising structure outside municipalities in the Commonwealth without first obtaining a permit therefor from the Commissioner of Highways and paying the annual fee therefor, as provided in this article. A permit is required for an off-premises sign, advertisement, or advertising structure authorized by §

33.2-1217

if it is located within a municipality and is visible from the main traveled way of any Interstate System, federal-aid primary, or National Highway System highway.

No bond or permit is required for the posting or display of any advertisement posted or displayed on any advertising structure or space for which a permit has been issued or renewed for the then-current calendar year under the provisions of this article unless such permit has been revoked.

History.

Code 1950, § 33-307; 1970, c. 322, § 33.1-360; 1993, c. 538; 2012, c. 145; 2014, c. 805.

Cross references.

As to notice of filing of
petition for
condemnation,
see §

25.1-209

.

As to meaning of “owner” in proceedings instituted by the Commissioner of Highways under Title 25.1 or Title 33.2 as including persons owning structures or improvements for which an outdoor advertising permit has been issued by the Commissioner pursuant to §

33.2-1208

, see §

33.2-1000

.

As to service of notice of filing of condemnation petition upon person owning structures or improvements for which an outdoor advertising permit has been issued, see §

33.2-1016

.

§ 33.2-1209.
Applications for permits; fees.

A separate application for a permit shall be made for each separate advertisement or advertising structure, on a form furnished by the Commissioner of Highways, which application shall be signed by the applicant or his representative duly authorized in writing to act for him and shall describe and set forth the size, shape, and nature of the advertisement or advertising structure it is proposed to post, display, erect, or maintain and its actual or proposed location with sufficient accuracy to enable the Commissioner of Highways to identify such advertisement or advertising structure and to find its actual or proposed location.

Each application shall be accompanied by an application fee in an amount determined on the basis of the area of the advertisement or advertising structure for which the permit is sought, according to the following schedule:

$15 if such area does not exceed 74 square feet;

$30 if such area exceeds 74 square feet but does not exceed 1,824 square feet; and

$165 if such area exceeds 1,824 square feet.In the computation of fees under this subsection, each side of the advertisement or advertising structure used or constructed to be used shall be separately considered. If the applicant elects to use an electronic application, the fee shall be reduced by $5 per application.The fee shall be retained by the Commissioner of Highways if the permit is issued. If the permit is refused, the Commissioner of Highways shall refund one-half of the application fee to the applicant.

In addition to the fees required by subsection B, on any original application for an advertisement or advertising structure there shall be imposed an inspection charge of $50 for any advertisement or advertising structure to be located on an Interstate System, federal-aid primary, or National Highway System highway and $25 for any advertisement or advertising structure to be located on any other highway.

Each application shall be accompanied by the written consent, or in lieu thereof a copy certified by an officer authorized to take acknowledgments to deeds in the Commonwealth, of the owner of the real property upon which such advertisement or advertising structure is to be erected, used, maintained, posted, or displayed, or of such other person having the legal right to grant such consent, or of the duly authorized agent of such owner or other person, except that in the marsh or meadowland owned by the Commonwealth along either side of the causeway leading from the mainland to the Town of Chincoteague, the legal right to grant such consent shall be vested in the local governing body of such town.

Application shall be made in like manner for a permit to use, maintain, or display an existing advertisement or advertising structure.

History.

Code 1950, § 33-308; 1954, c. 588; 1959, Ex. Sess., c. 20; 1964, c. 619; 1968, c. 519; 1970, c. 322, § 33.1-361; 1979, c. 216; 1993, c. 538; 2012, c. 145; 2014, c. 805.

Research References.

Virginia Forms (Matthew Bender). No. 16-121 Lease of Premises for Sign.

§ 33.2-1210.
Duration and renewal of permit.

Except as provided in §

33.2-1212

, permits issued in accordance with this article shall run for the calendar year and may be renewed upon application made upon forms furnished by the Commissioner of Highways and the payment of the same fee required to be paid upon application for a permit. Fees for renewal of permits using the Department’s electronic application renewal process shall be reduced by $5 per permit being renewed. Permits shall not be extended or renewed in cases where the permittee has not exercised the privilege of erecting such advertising structure or displayed such advertisement during the period for which the permit was issued. Annual permits issued after December 15 shall cover the following calendar year.

History.

Code 1950, § 33-309; 1954, c. 588; 1970, c. 322, § 33.1-362; 2012, c. 145; 2014, c. 805.

§ 33.2-1211.
Revocation of permit.

The Commissioner of Highways may, after 30 days’ notice in writing to the permittee, revoke any permit issued by him under §

33.2-1208

upon repayment of a proportionate part of the fee in any case in which it appears to the Commissioner of Highways that the application for the permit contains knowingly false or misleading information, that the permittee has failed to keep in a good general condition and in a reasonable state of repair the advertisement or advertising structure for which such permit was issued, or that the permittee has violated any of the provisions of this article, unless such permittee, before the expiration of such 30 days, corrects such false or misleading information or makes the necessary repairs or improvement in the general condition of such advertisement or advertising structure or complies with the provisions of this article. If the erection, maintenance, and display of any advertisement or advertising structure for which a permit is issued by the Commissioner of Highways and the permit fee has been paid as above provided is prevented by any zoning board, commission, or other public agency that also has jurisdiction over the proposed advertisement or advertising structure or its site, the application fee for such advertisement or advertising structure shall be returned by the Commissioner of Highways and the permit revoked. However, one-half of the application fee shall be deemed to have accrued upon the erection of an advertising structure or the display of an advertisement followed by an inspection by the Commissioner of Highways or his representative.

History.

Code 1950, § 33-311; 1970, c. 322, § 33.1-364; 2014, c. 805.

§ 33.2-1212.
Temporary permit.

In any case in which an applicant for a permit certifies in his application that he is unable to state the actual or proposed location of the advertisement or advertising structure or to file the written consent of the landowner or other person having the legal right to the real estate upon which the advertisement or advertising structure is to be erected, used, maintained, posted, or displayed, the Commissioner of Highways shall issue to such applicant a temporary permit, which shall expire 60 days from the date of issue, together with the proper identification number to be attached to such advertisement or advertising structure. Applications for temporary permits must indicate the county and route on which the advertisement or advertising structure is to be located and must be accompanied by a fee of $2 to cover the cost of issuance of the temporary permit. If within such 60 days the applicant files with the Commissioner of Highways an application setting forth all of the information required in §

33.2-1209

, together with the required fees, the Commissioner of Highways shall issue to such applicant a permit. In the event that the permit is not issued, the fees submitted shall be returned, except the $2 for the temporary permit.

History.

Code 1950, § 33-312; 1954, c. 588; 1970, c. 322, § 33.1-365; 1979, c. 216; 2014, c. 805.

§ 33.2-1213.
Appeal from refusal or revocation of permit.

Any person aggrieved by any action of the Commissioner of Highways in refusing to grant or in revoking a permit under §

33.2-1209

or

33.2-1211

may appeal from the decision of the Commissioner of Highways in accordance with the provisions of the Administrative Process Act (§

2.2-4000

et seq.).

History.

Code 1950, § 33-313; 1970, c. 322, § 33.1-366; 1986, c. 615; 2014, c. 805.

§ 33.2-1214.
Transfer of licenses and permits to successor concerns.

Any license or permit issued pursuant to this article may be transferred to any person that acquires as a successor the business of the person for whom such license or permit was issued.

History.

Code 1950, § 33-314; 1954, c. 588; 1970, c. 322, § 33.1-367; 2014, c. 805.

§ 33.2-1215.
Identification of advertising structure or advertisement.

The Commissioner of Highways shall require that each advertising structure and each advertisement not posted or displayed on an advertising structure bear an identification number furnished by the Commissioner of Highways and, if erected, maintained, or displayed by a licensed outdoor advertiser, also bear its name. The Commissioner of Highways shall make suitable provisions for the details thereof.

History.

Code 1950, § 33-316; 1970, c. 322, § 33.1-368; 2014, c. 805.

§ 33.2-1216.
Certain advertisements or structures prohibited.

No advertisement or advertising structure shall be erected, maintained, or operated:

Within 660 feet of the nearest edge of the right-of-way of the Blue Ridge Parkway, the Colonial National Parkway, the Mount Vernon Boulevard, or any other parkway within the Commonwealth or within 660 feet of any public cemetery, public park reservation, public playground, national forest, or state forest, outside the limits of any municipality; however, any advertisement or advertising structure that is lawfully in place on April 6, 1966, and that does not conform to the 660-foot distance requirement may be maintained for the life of the advertisement or advertising structure;

That involves motion or rotation of any part of the structure, moving reflective disks, or running animation or that displays an intermittent light or lights visible from any highway. The prohibition of this subdivision shall not apply to (i) an advertisement or advertisement structure with messages that change no more than once every four seconds and that is consistent with agreements entered into between the Commissioner of Highways and the U.S. Department of Transportation or (ii) an on-premises advertisement or advertising structure with messages displayed as scrolling words or numbers;

That uses the words “stop” or “danger” prominently displayed or presents or implies the need or requirement of stopping or the existence of danger on any highway or that is a copy or imitation of official highway signs;

That, within visible distance of any highway, advertises any county, city, town, historic place, museum, or shrine without the consent in writing of such county, city, or town or of the owner of such historic place or shrine;

That is mobile and is designed to and effectively does distract the attention of passing motorists on any highway by flashing lights, loud and blatant noises, or movable objects;

That involves red, green, or amber lights or reflectorized material and resembles traffic signal lights or traffic control signs and is within visible distance of any highway;

Within 15 feet of the nearest edge of the pavement of any highway; however, the Commissioner of Highways may waive this restriction whenever the advertisement or advertising structure is actually anchored outside of the right-of-way and, within his discretion, does not constitute a safety hazard or conflict with any other restriction contained in this section;

At any public road intersection in such a manner as would obstruct the clear vision in either direction between a point on the centerline of the side road 20 feet from the nearest edge of the pavement of the main road and points on the main road 400 feet distant, measured along the nearest edge of the pavement of the main road;

At any grade intersection of a public road and a railroad in such a manner as would obstruct the clear vision in either direction within triangular areas formed by (i) a point at the center of the railroad-public road intersection, (ii) a point on the public road 400 feet from the center of the railroad-public road intersection as measured along the center of the public road, and (iii) a point on the railroad 500 feet from the center of the railroad-public road intersection as measured along the center of the railroad;

At or near any curve in a road in such a manner as to obstruct the clear vision of traffic from any one point on such curve to any other point not more than 400 feet apart, as measured between each point from the nearest edge of the pavement;

That advertises activities that are illegal under state or federal laws or regulations in effect at the location of such sign or advertisement or at the location of such activities;

That is obsolete or inconsistent with this article or regulations adopted by the Board pursuant to this article; or

After December 18, 1991, adjacent to any Interstate System, federal-aid primary, or National Highway System highway in the Commonwealth that has been designated as a Virginia byway or scenic highway, except directional and official signs and notices defined in this article and regulations adopted pursuant to this article, on-premises signs, and signs advertising the sale or lease of property upon which they are located.

History.

Code 1950, § 33-317; 1954, c. 588; 1956, c. 676; 1958, c. 369; 1960, c. 406; 1966, c. 663; 1968, c. 230; 1970, c. 322, § 33.1-369; 1976, c. 14; 1977, c. 219; 1993, c. 538; 1999, c. 290; 2000, c. 140; 2001, c. 285; 2014, c. 805.